en: Sandwiches with vegetables and mayonnaise
de: Gemüse-Sandwiches mit Mayonnaise
es: Sándwiches de verduras y mayonesa
fr: Sandwichs crudités mayonnaise
hr: Sendviči s povrćem i majonezom
it: Sandwich con verdure e maionese
nl: Broodjes met groenten en mayonaise
pt: Sanduíches com vegetais e maionese

en: Baguette sandwiches with vegetables and mayonnaise
de: Baguette-Sandwiches mit Gemüse und Mayonnaise
es: Bocadillos de verduras y mayonesa
fr: Sandwich baguette crudités mayonnaise
hr: Baguette sendviči s povrćem i majonezom
it: Panini con verdure e maionese
nl: Stokbrood sandwiches met groenten en mayonaise
pt: Sanduíches de baguete com vegetais e maionese

en: Poultry sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с птици
de: Geflügelsandwiches
es: Bocadillos de aves, Sándwiches de aves
fi: siipikarjavoileivät
fr: Sandwichs à la volaille
hr: Sendviči od peradi
it: Panini di carne avicola, Panini al pollame
ja: 鳥のサンドイッチ
ko: 가금류 샌드위치
nl: Gevogelte sandwiches, pluimvee sandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de aves
ru: Сэндвичи с птицей
zh: 家禽三明治

en: Chicken sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с пилешко
de: Hähnchensandwiche
es: Sándwiches de pollo
fr: Sandwichs au poulet
hr: Sendviči s piletinom
it: Panini al pollo, Tramezzini al pollo, Sandwich al pollo
nl: Kipsandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de frango

en: Baguette sandwiches with and chicken and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwich baguette poulet crudités mayonnaise

en: Sandwich made with wholemeal loaf bread and chicken and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwichs pain de mie complet poulet crudités mayonnaise

en: Turkey sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с пуешко
de: Truthahn-Sandwichs, Truthahn-Sandwiches, Puten-Sandwichs, Puten-Sandwiches
fr: Sandwichs à la dinde
hr: Sendviči s puretinom
nl: Kalkoensandwiches

en: Baguette sandwiches with and turkey and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwichs baguette dinde crudités mayonnaise

en: Sandwiches filled with cold cuts, Meat sandwiches
de: Sandwiche belegt mit Aufschnitt
fi: voileivät leikkeleillä
fr: Sandwichs garnis de charcuteries
hr: Sendviči punjeni narescima
nl: Vleeswaren sandwiches

en: Baguette sandwiches with dry sausage and butter
fr: Sandwichs saucisson beurre, Sandwich baguette saucisson beurre

en: Rosette Sandwiches, Sandwiches filled with rosette
bg: Сандвичи с розет
de: Rosette-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de rosette
fi: Rosettevoileivät
fr: Sandwichs à la rosette, Sandwichs baguette à la rosette
hr: Sendviči s rozetama
it: Panini alla rosette
nl: Rosette sandwich
pt: Sanduíches de rosette

en: Coppa sandwiches, Sandwiches filled with coppa
bg: Сандвичи с копа
de: Coppa-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de coppa
fi: Coppavoileivät
fr: Sandwichs à la coppa
hr: Coppa sendviči
it: Panini alla coppa
nl: Coppa sandwich
pt: Sanduíches de coppa

en: Bacon sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с бекон
de: Bacon-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de tocino
fi: Baconvoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au bacon
hr: Sendviči sa slaninom
it: Panini al bacon
nl: Speksandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de bacon

en: Sandwich with pâté and pickles, Baguette sandwiches with pâté and pickles
bg: Сандвич с пастет и кисели краставички, Сандвичи с пастет и кисели краставички
de: Sandwich mit Pastete und Gurken, Baguette-Sandwiches mit Pastete und Gurken
es: Bocadillo de paté y pepinillos, Bocadillos de baguette con paté y pepinillos
fi: Paté- ja suolakurkkusandwich, Paté- ja suolakurkkusandwichit
fr: Sandwich pâté cornichons, Sandwichs baguette pâté cornichons
hr: Sendvič s paštetom i kiselim krastavcima
it: Panino con paté e cetriolini, Panini baguette con paté e cetriolini
nl: Sandwich met paté en augurken, Baguette sandwiches met paté en augurken
pt: Sanduíche de patê e pepinos, Sanduíches de baguete com patê e pepinos

en: Ham sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с шунка
de: Schinkensandwich
es: Sandwiches de jamón
fi: kinkkuvoileivät
fr: Sandwichs au jambon
hr: Sendviči sa šunkom
it: Panini al prosciutto, Tramezzini al prosciutto, Sandwich al prosciutto
nl: Hamsandwiches
pt: Sanduíches de presunto
ru: Бутерброды с ветчиной
sv: Skinksmörgåsar

en: Ham and butter sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи с шунка и масло
de: Schinken-Butter-Sandwiches
es: Bocadillos de jamón y mantequilla
fi: Kinkku ja voin voileipä
fr: Sandwichs Jambon Beurre, Jambon-beurre
hr: Sendviči sa šunkom i maslacem
it: Panini al prosciutto e burro
nl: Sandwiches met boter en ham
pt: Sanduíches de presunto e manteiga

en: Baguette sandwiches with ham and butter
bg: Сандвичи с френска хляб, шунка и масло
de: Baguette-Sandwiches mit Schinken und Butter
es: Bocadillos de baguette con jamón y mantequilla
fi: Patonkisandwichit kinkulla ja voilla
fr: Sandwich baguette jambon beurre
hr: Baguette sendviči sa šunkom i maslacem
it: Panini baguette con prosciutto e burro
nl: Stokbrood sandwiches met ham en boter
pt: Sanduíches de baguete com presunto e manteiga

en: Sandwich made with loaf bread and various fillings
fr: Sandwich pain de mie avec garnitures diverses

en: Sandwich with ham and vegetables and cheese
fr: Sandwich jambon crudités fromage

en: Sausage bacon and egg sandwiches
bg: Сандвичи със сосиска, бекон и яйца
de: Brötchen mit Wurst, Speck und Ei
es: Bocadillos de salchicha, tocino y huevo
fi: Makkara, pekoni ja munavoileivät
fr: Sandwiches saucisse bacon et œuf
hr: Slanina od kobasica i sendviči s jajima
it: Panini con salsiccia, pancetta e uova
nl: Broodjes met worst, spek en ei